Vermont, session 2025-2026, H74.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. § 5830e is amended to read:
§ 5830e. RETIREMENT INCOME; SOCIAL SECURITY INCOME
(a) Social Security income. The portion of federally taxable Social
Security benefits excluded from taxable income under subdivision
5811(21)(B)(iv) of this chapter shall be as follows:
VT LEG #379192 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.74
2025 Page 3 of 24
(1) For taxpayers whose filing status is single, married filing separately,
head of household, or surviving spouse:
(A) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is less than or
equal to $50,000.00 $65,000.00, all federally taxable benefits received under
the federal Social Security Act shall be excluded.
(B) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is greater
than $50,000.00 $65,000.00 but less than $60,000.00 $75,000.00, the
percentage of federally taxable benefits received under the Social Security Act
to be excluded shall be proportional to the amount of the taxpayer’s federal
adjusted gross income over $50,000.00 $65,000.00, determined by:
(i) subtracting the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer
from $60,000.00 $75,000.00;
(ii) dividing the value under subdivision (i) of this subdivision (B)
by $10,000.00; and
(iii) multiplying the value under subdivision (ii) of this
subdivision (B) by the federally taxable benefits received under the Social
Security Act.
(C) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is equal to or
greater than $60,000.00 $75,000.00, no amount of the federally taxable
benefits received under the Social Security Act shall be excluded under this
section.
VT LEG #379192 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.74
2025 Page 4 of 24
(2) For taxpayers whose filing status is married filing jointly:
(A) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is less than or
equal to $65,000.00 $80,000.00, all federally taxable benefits received under
the Social Security Act shall be excluded.
(B) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is greater
than $65,000.00 $80,000.00 but less than $75,000.00 $90,000.00, the
percentage of federally taxable benefits received under the Social Security Act
to be excluded shall be proportional to the amount of the taxpayer’s federal
adjusted gross income over $65,000.00 $80,000.00, determined by:
(i) subtracting the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer
from $75,000.00 $90,000.00;
(ii) dividing the value under subdivision (i) of this subdivision (B)
by $10,000.00; and
(iii) multiplying the value under subdivision (ii) of this
subdivision (B) by the federally taxable benefits received under the Social
Security Act.
(C) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is equal to or
greater than $75,000.00 $90,000.00, no amount of the federally taxable
benefits received under the Social Security Act shall be excluded under this
section.
* * *
VT LEG #379192 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.74
2025 Page 5 of 24
Sec. 2. 32 V.S.A. § 5830e is amended to read:
§ 5830e. RETIREMENT INCOME; SOCIAL SECURITY INCOME
(a) Social Security income. The portion of federally taxable Social
Security benefits excluded from taxable income under subdivision
5811(21)(B)(iv) of this chapter shall be as follows:
(1) For taxpayers whose filing status is single, married filing separately,
head of household, or surviving spouse:
(A) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is less than or
equal to $65,000.00 $77,000.00, all federally taxable benefits received under
the federal Social Security Act shall be excluded.
(B) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is greater
than $65,000.00 $77,000.00 but less than $75,000.00 $87,000.00, the
percentage of federally taxable benefits received under the Social Security Act
to be excluded shall be proportional to the amount of the taxpayer’s federal
adjusted gross income over $65,000.00 $77,000.00, determined by:
(i) subtracting the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer
from $75,000.00 $87,000.00;
(ii) dividing the value under subdivision (i) of this subdivision (B)
by $10,000.00; and
VT LEG #379192 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.74
2025 Page 6 of 24
(iii) multiplying the value under subdivision (ii) of this
subdivision (B) by the federally taxable benefits received under the Social
Security Act.
(C) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is equal to or
greater than $75,000.00 $87,000.00, no amount of the federally taxable
benefits received under the Social Security Act shall be excluded under this
section.
(2) For taxpayers whose filing status is married filing jointly:
(A) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is less than or
equal to $80,000.00 $92,000.00, all federally taxable benefits received under
the Social Security Act shall be excluded.
(B) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is greater
than $80,000.00 $92,000.00 but less than $90,000.00 $102,000.00, the
percentage of federally taxable benefits received under the Social Security Act
to be excluded shall be proportional to the amount of the taxpayer’s federal
adjusted gross income over $80,000.00 $92,000.00, determined by:
(i) subtracting the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer
from $90,000.00 $102,000.00;
(ii) dividing the value under subdivision (i) of this subdivision (B)
by $10,000.00; and
VT LEG #379192 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.74
2025 Page 7 of 24
(iii) multiplying the value under subdivision (ii) of this
subdivision (B) by the federally taxable benefits received under the Social
Security Act.
(C) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is equal to or
greater than $90,000.00 $102,000.00, no amount of the federally taxable
benefits received under the Social Security Act shall be excluded under this
section.
* * *
Sec. 3. 32 V.S.A. § 5830e is amended to read:
§ 5830e. RETIREMENT INCOME; SOCIAL SECURITY INCOME
(a) Social Security income. The portion of federally taxable Social
Security benefits excluded from taxable income under subdivision
5811(21)(B)(iv) of this chapter shall be as follows:
(1) For taxpayers whose filing status is single, married filing separately,
head of household, or surviving spouse:
(A) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is less than or
equal to $77,000.00 $87,000.00, all federally taxable benefits received under
the federal Social Security Act shall be excluded.
(B) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is greater
than $77,000.00 $87,000.00 but less than $87,000.00 $97,000.00, the
percentage of federally taxable benefits received under the Social Security Act
VT LEG #379192 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.74
2025 Page 8 of 24
to be excluded shall be proportional to the amount of the taxpayer’s federal
adjusted gross income over $77,000.00 $87,000.00, determined by:
(i) subtracting the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer
from $87,000.00 $97,000.00;
(ii) dividing the value under subdivision (i) of this subdivision (B)
by $10,000.00; and
(iii) multiplying the value under subdivision (ii) of this
subdivision (B) by the federally taxable benefits received under the Social
Security Act.
(C) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is equal to or
greater than $87,000.00 $97,000.00, no amount of the federally taxable
benefits received under the Social Security Act shall be excluded under this
section.
(2) For taxpayers whose filing status is married filing jointly:
(A) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is less than or
equal to $92,000.00 $102,000.00, all federally taxable benefits received under
the Social Security Act shall be excluded.
(B) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is greater
than $92,000.00 $102,000.00 but less than $102,000.00 $112,000.00, the
percentage of federally taxable benefits received under the Social Security Act
VT LEG #379192 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.74
2025 Page 9 of 24
to be excluded shall be proportional to the amount of the taxpayer’s federal
adjusted gross income over $92,000.00 $102,000.00, determined by:
(i) subtracting the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer
from $102,000.00 $112,000.00;
(ii) dividing the value under subdivision (i) of this subdivision (B)
by $10,000.00; and
(iii) multiplying the value under subdivision (ii) of this
subdivision (B) by the federally taxable benefits received under the Social
Security Act.
(C) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is equal to or
greater than $102,000.00 $112,000.00, no amount of the federally taxable
benefits received under the Social Security Act shall be excluded under this
section.
* * *
Sec. 4. 32 V.S.A. § 5830e is amended to read:
§ 5830e. RETIREMENT INCOME; SOCIAL SECURITY INCOME
(a) Social Security income. The portion of federally taxable Social
Security benefits excluded from taxable income under subdivision
5811(21)(B)(iv) of this chapter shall be as follows:
(1) For taxpayers whose filing status is single, married filing separately,
head of household, or surviving spouse:
VT LEG #379192 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.74
2025 Page 10 of 24
(A) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is less than or
equal to $87,000.00 $97,000.00, all federally taxable benefits received under
the federal Social Security Act shall be excluded.
(B) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is greater
than $87,000.00 $97,000.00 but less than $97,000.00 $107,000.00, the
percentage of federally taxable benefits received under the Social Security Act
to be excluded shall be proportional to the amount of the taxpayer’s federal
adjusted gross income over $87,000.00 $97,000.00, determined by:
(i) subtracting the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer
from $97,000.00 $107,000.00;
(ii) dividing the value under subdivision (i) of this subdivision (B)
by $10,000.00; and
(iii) multiplying the value under subdivision (ii) of this
subdivision (B) by the federally taxable benefits received under the Social
Security Act.
(C) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is equal to or
greater than $97,000.00 $107,000.00, no amount of the federally taxable
benefits received under the Social Security Act shall be excluded under this
section.
(2) For taxpayers whose filing status is married filing jointly:
VT LEG #379192 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.74
2025 Page 11 of 24
(A) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is less than or
equal to $102,000.00 $112,000.00, all federally taxable benefits received under
the Social Security Act shall be excluded.
(B) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is greater
than $102,000.00 $112,000.00 but less than $112,000.00 $122,000.00, the
percentage of federally taxable benefits received under the Social Security Act
to be excluded shall be proportional to the amount of the taxpayer’s federal
adjusted gross income over $102,000.00 $112,000.00, determined by:
(i) subtracting the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer
from $112,000.00 $122,000.00;
(ii) dividing the value under subdivision (i) of this subdivision (B)
by $10,000.00; and
(iii) multiplying the value under subdivision (ii) of this
subdivision (B) by the federally taxable benefits received under the Social
Security Act.
(C) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is equal to or
greater than $112,000.00 $122,000.00, no amount of the federally taxable
benefits received under the Social Security Act shall be excluded under this
section.
* * *
VT LEG #379192 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.74
2025 Page 12 of 24
Sec. 5. 32 V.S.A. § 5830e is amended to read:
§ 5830e. RETIREMENT INCOME; SOCIAL SECURITY INCOME
(a) Social Security income. The portion of federally taxable Social
Security benefits excluded from taxable income under subdivision
5811(21)(B)(iv) of this chapter shall be as follows:
(1) For taxpayers whose filing status is single, married filing separately,
head of household, or surviving spouse:
(A) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is less than or
equal to $97,000.00 $107,000.00, all federally taxable benefits received under
the federal Social Security Act shall be excluded.
(B) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is greater
than $97,000.00 $107,000.00 but less than $107,000.00 $117,000.00, the
percentage of federally taxable benefits received under the Social Security Act
to be excluded shall be proportional to the amount of the taxpayer’s federal
adjusted gross income over $97,000.00 $107,000.00, determined by:
(i) subtracting the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer
from $107,000.00 $117,000.00;
(ii) dividing the value under subdivision (i) of this subdivision (B)
by $10,000.00; and
VT LEG #379192 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.74
2025 Page 13 of 24
(iii) multiplying the value under subdivision (ii) of this
subdivision (B) by the federally taxable benefits received under the Social
Security Act.
(C) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is equal to or
greater than $107,000.00 $117,000.00, no amount of the federally taxable
benefits received under the Social Security Act shall be excluded under this
section.
(2) For taxpayers whose filing status is married filing jointly:
(A) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is less than or
equal to $112,000.00 $122,000.00, all federally taxable benefits received under
the Social Security Act shall be excluded.
(B) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is greater
than $112,000.00 $122,000.00 but less than $122,000.00 $132,000.00, the
percentage of federally taxable benefits received under the Social Security Act
to be excluded shall be proportional to the amount of the taxpayer’s federal
adjusted gross income over $112,000.00 $122,000.00, determined by:
(i) subtracting the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer
from $122,000.00 $132,000.00;
(ii) dividing the value under subdivision (i) of this subdivision (B)
by $10,000.00; and
VT LEG #379192 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.74
2025 Page 14 of 24
(iii) multiplying the value under subdivision (ii) of this
subdivision (B) by the federally taxable benefits received under the Social
Security Act.
(C) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is equal to or
greater than $122,000.00 $132,000.00, no amount of the federally taxable
benefits received under the Social Security Act shall be excluded under this
section.
* * *
Sec. 6. 32 V.S.A. § 5830e is amended to read:
§ 5830e. RETIREMENT INCOME; SOCIAL SECURITY INCOME
(a) Social Security income. The portion of federally taxable Social
Security benefits excluded from taxable income under subdivision
5811(21)(B)(iv) of this chapter shall be as follows:
(1) For taxpayers whose filing status is single, married filing separately,
head of household, or surviving spouse:
(A) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is less than or
equal to $107,000.00 $117,000.00, all federally taxable benefits received under
the federal Social Security Act shall be excluded.
(B) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is greater
than $107,000.00 $117,000.00 but less than $117,000.00 $127,000.00, the
percentage of federally taxable benefits received under the Social Security Act
VT LEG #379192 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.74
2025 Page 15 of 24
to be excluded shall be proportional to the amount of the taxpayer’s federal
adjusted gross income over $107,000.00 $117,000.00, determined by:
(i) subtracting the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer
from $117,000.00 $127,000.00;
(ii) dividing the value under subdivision (i) of this subdivision (B)
by $10,000.00; and
(iii) multiplying the value under subdivision (ii) of this
subdivision (B) by the federally taxable benefits received under the Social
Security Act.
(C) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is equal to or
greater than $117,000.00 $127,000.00, no amount of the federally taxable
benefits received under the Social Security Act shall be excluded under this
section.
(2) For taxpayers whose filing status is married filing jointly:
(A) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is less than or
equal to $122,000.00 $132,000.00, all federally taxable benefits received under
the Social Security Act shall be excluded.
(B) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is greater
than $122,000.00 $132,000.00 but less than $132,000.00 $142,000.00, the
percentage of federally taxable benefits received under the Social Security Act
VT LEG #379192 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.74
2025 Page 16 of 24
to be excluded shall be proportional to the amount of the taxpayer’s federal
adjusted gross income over $122,000.00 $132,000.00, determined by:
(i) subtracting the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer
from $132,000.00 $142,000.00;
(ii) dividing the value under subdivision (i) of this subdivision (B)
by $10,000.00; and
(iii) multiplying the value under subdivision (ii) of this
subdivision (B) by the federally taxable benefits received under the Social
Security Act.
(C) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is equal to or
greater than $132,000.00 $142,000.00, no amount of the federally taxable
benefits received under the Social Security Act shall be excluded under this
section.
* * *
Sec. 7. 32 V.S.A. § 5830e is amended to read:
§ 5830e. RETIREMENT INCOME; SOCIAL SECURITY INCOME
(a) Social Security income. The portion of federally taxable Social
Security benefits excluded from taxable income under subdivision
5811(21)(B)(iv) of this chapter shall be as follows:
(1) For taxpayers whose filing status is single, married filing separately,
head of household, or surviving spouse:
VT LEG #379192 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.74
2025 Page 17 of 24
(A) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is less than or
equal to $117,000.00 $127,000.00, all federally taxable benefits received under
the federal Social Security Act shall be excluded.
(B) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is greater
than $117,000.00 $127,000.00 but less than $127,000.00 $137,000.00, the
percentage of federally taxable benefits received under the Social Security Act
to be excluded shall be proportional to the amount of the taxpayer’s federal
adjusted gross income over $117,000.00 $127,000.00, determined by:
(i) subtracting the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer
from $127,000.00 $137,000.00;
(ii) dividing the value under subdivision (i) of this subdivision (B)
by $10,000.00; and
(iii) multiplying the value under subdivision (ii) of this
subdivision (B) by the federally taxable benefits received under the Social
Security Act.
(C) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is equal to or
greater than $127,000.00 $137,000.00, no amount of the federally taxable
benefits received under the Social Security Act shall be excluded under this
section.
(2) For taxpayers whose filing status is married filing jointly:
VT LEG #379192 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.74
2025 Page 18 of 24
(A) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is less than or
equal to $132,000.00 $142,000.00, all federally taxable benefits received under
the Social Security Act shall be excluded.
(B) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is greater
than $132,000.00 $142,000.00 but less than $142,000.00 $152,000.00, the
percentage of federally taxable benefits received under the Social Security Act
to be excluded shall be proportional to the amount of the taxpayer’s federal
adjusted gross income over $132,000.00 $142,000.00, determined by:
(i) subtracting the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer
from $142,000.00 $152,000.00;
(ii) dividing the value under subdivision (i) of this subdivision (B)
by $10,000.00; and
(iii) multiplying the value under subdivision (ii) of this
subdivision (B) by the federally taxable benefits received under the Social
Security Act.
(C) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is equal to or
greater than $142,000.00 $152,000.00, no amount of the federally taxable
benefits received under the Social Security Act shall be excluded under this
section.
* * *
VT LEG #379192 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.74
2025 Page 19 of 24
Sec. 8. 32 V.S.A. § 5830e is amended to read:
§ 5830e. RETIREMENT INCOME; SOCIAL SECURITY INCOME
(a) Social Security income. The portion of federally taxable Social
Security benefits excluded from taxable income under subdivision
5811(21)(B)(iv) of this chapter shall be as follows:
(1) For taxpayers whose filing status is single, married filing separately,
head of household, or surviving spouse:
(A) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is less than or
equal to $127,000.00, all federally taxable benefits received under the federal
Social Security Act shall be excluded.
(B) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is greater
than $127,000.00 but less than $137,000.00, the percentage of federally taxable
benefits received under the Social Security Act to be excluded shall be
proportional to the amount of the taxpayer’s federal adjusted gross income
over $127,000.00, determined by:
(i) subtracting the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer
from $137,000.00;
(ii) dividing the value under subdivision (i) of this subdivision (B)
by $10,000.00; and
VT LEG #379192 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.74
2025 Page 20 of 24
(iii) multiplying the value under subdivision (ii) of this
subdivision (B) by the federally taxable benefits received under the Social
Security Act.
(C) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is equal to or
greater than $137,000.00, no amount of the federally taxable benefits received
under the Social Security Act shall be excluded under this section.
(2) For taxpayers whose filing status is married filing jointly:
(A) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is less than or
equal to $142,000.00, all federally taxable benefits received under the Social
Security Act shall be excluded.
(B) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is greater
than $142,000.00 but less than $152,000.00, the percentage of federally taxable
benefits received under the Social Security Act to be excluded shall be
proportional to the amount of the taxpayer’s federal adjusted gross income
over $142,000.00, determined by:
(i) subtracting the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer
from $152,000.00;
(ii) dividing the value under subdivision (i) of this subdivision (B)
by $10,000.00; and
VT LEG #379192 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.74
2025 Page 21 of 24
(iii) multiplying the value under subdivision (ii) of this
subdivision (B) by the federally taxable benefits received under the Social
Security Act.
(C) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is equal to or
greater than $152,000.00, no amount of the federally taxable benefits received
under the Social Security Act shall be excluded under this section. [Repealed.]
* * *
(e) Requirement to elect one exclusion. A taxpayer of this State who is
eligible during the taxable year for the Social Security income exclusion under
subsection (a) of this section and any of the exclusions under subsections (b)–
(d) of this section shall elect either one of the exclusions for which the
taxpayer is eligible under subsections (b)–(d) of this section or the Social
Security income exclusion under subsection (a) of this section, but not both,
for the taxable year. A taxpayer of this State who is eligible during the taxable
year for more than one of the exclusions under subsections (b)–(d) of this
section shall elect only one of the exclusions for which the taxpayer is eligible
for the taxable year.
Sec. 9. 32 V.S.A. § 5811 is amended to read:
§ 5811. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter unless the context requires otherwise:
* * *
VT LEG #379192 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.74
2025 Page 22 of 24
(21) “Taxable income” means, in the case of an individual, federal
adjusted gross income determined without regard to 26 U.S.C. § 168(k) and:
* * *
(B) decreased by the following items of income (to the extent such
income is included in federal adjusted gross income):
* * *
(iv) the portion of certain retirement income and federally taxable
benefits received under the federal Social Security Act that is required to be
excluded under section 5830e of this chapter and all federally taxable benefits
received under the Social Security Act;
* * *
Sec. 10. 32 V.S.A. § 5813 is amended to read:
§ 5813. STATUTORY PURPOSES
* * *
(w) The statutory purpose of the partial exemption of federally taxable
benefits under the Social Security Act and certain retirement income in section
5830e of this title is to lessen the tax burden on Vermonters with low to
moderate income who derive part of their income from Social Security benefits
and certain retirement income.
* * *
VT LEG #379192 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.74
2025 Page 23 of 24
(aa) The statutory purpose of the exemption of all federally taxable benefits
under the Social Security Act in subdivision 5811(21)(B)(iv) of this title is to
lessen the tax burden on Vermonters who derive part of their income from
Social Security benefits.
Sec. 11. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) Notwithstanding 1 V.S.A. § 214, Sec. 1 and this section shall take effect
retroactively on January 1, 2025 and apply to taxable years on and after
January 1, 2025.
(b) Sec. 2 shall take effect on January 1, 2026 and apply to taxable years on
and after January 1, 2026.
(c) Sec. 3 shall take effect on January 1, 2027 and apply to taxable years on
and after January 1, 2027.
(d) Sec. 4 shall take effect on January 1, 2028 and apply to taxable years on
and after January 1, 2028.
(e) Sec. 5 shall take effect on January 1, 2029 and apply to taxable years on
and after January 1, 2029.
(f) Sec. 6 shall take effect on January 1, 2030 and apply to taxable years on
and after January 1, 2030.
(g) Sec. 7 shall take effect on January 1, 2031 and apply to taxable years on
and after January 1, 2031.
VT LEG #379192 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.74
2025 Page 24 of 24
(h) Secs. 8–10 shall take effect on January 1, 2032 and apply to taxable
years on and after January 1, 2032.
VT LEG #379192 v.1